Illinois, session 104th, SB362.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Judicial Privacy Act is amended by changing 5Section 1-1 as follows: 6    (705 ILCS 90/1-1)7    Sec. 1-1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Judicial Privacy Act.9(Source: P.A. 97-847, eff. 9-22-12.)